src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pt.aff
SFX r Y 46
SFX r   ogia            gico          logia
SFX r   ogia            gica          logia
SFX r   ogia            gicos         logia
SFX r   ogia            gicas         logia
SFX r   ografia         grafo         ografia
SFX r   ografia         grafa         ografia
SFX r   ografia         grafos        ografia
SFX r   ografia         grafas        ografia
SFX r   omia            mico          nomia
SFX r   omia            mica          nomia
SFX r   omia            micos         nomia
SFX r   omia            micas         nomia
SFX r   ia              aco           mania
SFX r   ia              aca           mania
SFX r   ia              acos          mania
SFX r   ia              acas          mania
SFX r   acia            tico          cracia
SFX r   acia            tica          cracia
SFX r   acia            ticos         cracia
SFX r   acia            ticas         cracia
SFX r   icultura        cola          icultura
SFX r   icultura        colas         icultura
SFX r   arquia          rquico        arquia
SFX r   arquia          rquica        arquia
SFX r   arquia          rquicos       arquia
SFX r   arquia          rquicas       arquia
SFX r   obia            bico          fobia
SFX r   obia            bica          fobia
SFX r   obia            bicos         fobia
SFX r   obia            bicas         fobia
SFX r   atia            tico          patia
SFX r   atia            tica          patia
SFX r   atia            ticos         patia
SFX r   atia            ticas         patia
SFX r   etria           trico         metria
SFX r   etria           trica         metria
SFX r   etria           tricos        metria
SFX r   etria           tricas        metria
SFX r   orfia           rfico         morfia
SFX r   orfia           rfica         morfia
SFX r   orfia           rficos        morfia
SFX r   orfia           rficas        morfia
SFX r   morfismo       m rfico        morfismo
SFX r   morfismo       m rfica        morfismo
SFX r   morfismo       m rficos       morfismo
SFX r   morfismo       m rficas       morfismo

SFX s Y 36
SFX s   o               ssimo         [^c g]o
SFX s   co             qu ssimo       co
SFX s    o             c ssimo         o
SFX s   go             gu ssimo       go
SFX s   e               ssimo         e
SFX s   0               ssimo         [lr]
SFX s    s             es ssimo        s
SFX s   z              c ssimo        z
SFX s    vel           abil ssimo      vel
SFX s   o               ssima         [^c g]o
SFX s   co             qu ssima       co
SFX s    o             c ssima         o
SFX s   go             gu ssima       go
SFX s   e               ssima         e
SFX s   0               ssima         [lr]
SFX s    s             es ssima        s
SFX s   z              c ssima        z
SFX s    vel           abil ssima      vel
SFX s   o               ssimos        [^c g]o
SFX s   co             qu ssimos      co
SFX s    o             c ssimos        o
SFX s   go             gu ssimos      go
SFX s   e               ssimos        e
SFX s   0               ssimos        [lr]
SFX s    s             es ssimos       s
SFX s   z              c ssimos       z
SFX s    vel           abil ssimos     vel
SFX s   o               ssimas        [^c g]o
SFX s   co             qu ssimas      co
SFX s    o             c ssimas        o
SFX s   go             gu ssimas      go
SFX s   e               ssimas        e
SFX s   0               ssimas        [lr]
SFX s    s             es ssimas       s
SFX s   z              c ssimas       z
SFX s    vel           abil ssimas     vel

SFX d Y 22
SFX d   o              idade          [^ g]o
SFX d    o             cidade          o
SFX d   go             guidade        go
SFX d   e              idade          e
SFX d   0              idade          r
SFX d   0              idade          [^v][^q]l
SFX d   vel            bilidade       [^   ]vel
SFX d    vel           abilidade       vel
SFX d    vel           ibilidade       vel
SFX d    vel           ubilidade       vel
SFX d   z              cidade         z
SFX d   o              idades         [^ g]o
SFX d    o             cidades         o
SFX d   go             guidades       go
SFX d   e              idades         e
SFX d   0              idades         r
SFX d   0              idades         [^v][^q]l
SFX d   vel            bilidades      [^  ]vel
SFX d    vel           abilidades      vel
SFX d    vel           ibilidades      vel
SFX d    vel           ubilidades      vel
SFX d   z              cidades        z

SFX i Y 24
SFX i   o              ismo           [^c  ]o
SFX i   co             quismo         co
SFX i    o             cismo           o
SFX i     o            cionismo         o
SFX i   a              ismo           [^icg]a
SFX i   a              smo            ia
SFX i   ca             quismo         ca
SFX i   ga             guismo         ga
SFX i   e              ismo           e
SFX i   0              ismo           [lr]
SFX i    s             esismo          s
SFX i   m              nismo          m
SFX i   o              ismos          [^c  ]o
SFX i   co             quismos        co
SFX i    o             cismos          o
SFX i     o            cionismos        o
SFX i   a              ismos          [^icg]a
SFX i   a              smos           ia
SFX i   ca             quismos        ca
SFX i   ga             guismos        ga
SFX i   e              ismos          e
SFX i   0              ismos          [lr]
SFX i    s             esismos         s
SFX i   m              nismos         m

SFX t Y 24
SFX t   o              ista           [^c  i]o
SFX t   co             quista         co
SFX t    o             cista           o
SFX t     o            cionista         o
SFX t   s o            sionista       s o
SFX t   io              sta           io
SFX t   a              ista           [^i g]a
SFX t   a              sta            ia
SFX t    a             cista           a
SFX t   a              uista          ga
SFX t   e              ista           e
SFX t   0              ista           [lr]
SFX t   o              istas          [^c  ]o
SFX t   co             quistas        co
SFX t    o             cistas          o
SFX t     o            cionistas        o
SFX t   s o            sionistas      s o
SFX t   io              stas          io
SFX t   a              istas          [^i g]a
SFX t   a              stas           ia
SFX t    a             cistas          a
SFX t   a              uistas         ga
SFX t   e              istas          e
SFX t   0              istas          [lr]
