src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pt.dic
adesivo/fdp
advento/tip
afectivo/fpmd
agrad vel/dsm
agressivo/fpdm
agrologia/qr
agronomia/pr
airoso/dpfsm
alarme/tip
albino/ifp
alimento/pt
americano/pfti
amoral/pid
analogia/pr
anarquia/prti
andrologia/pt
animoso/fpd
anticorporativo/i
antinomia/pr
antropologia/qtr
antropomorfismo/pr
apaixonado/s
apercept vel/d
apicultura/prq
aquoso/fpd
aristocracia/qr
arranjo/pftiSR
associativo/pfdit
astrobiologia/pr
astronomia/r
atrasado/fps
audaz/dp
autarquia/pr
automorfismo/pr
avicultura/prq
avo/t
bacteriologia/qtr
bairro/pti
baixo/pfts
bala/pt
banal/dmp
barometria/r
base/pt
beato/pfis
belo/pfs
biometria/pr
biotipologia/pr
bipolar/pd
bolsa/pt
Bonaparte/it
borla/t
branco/fpsh
breve/pmds
brilhante/pispm
brutal/pdm
bule/t
burgu s/fpi
Cabral/it
calcografia/pqr
calo/pt
caloteiro/ifp
camoniano/ft
canibal/pi
capaz/pdm
capital/ppjit
cardiologia/prt
carnoso/fpd
caro/pfpfs
carola/iGp
castelhano/fpi
casual/ptidm
causal/pmd
cenografia/pqr
central/ptidm
centro/pft
certo/fpfms
ciclomotor/pt
cineclube/pti
cinefilia/pt
circular/mpXYBdcDn
citologia/pr
clarinete/pt
claustrofobia/pqr
clerofobia/r
clube/pti
coerc vel/pd
colabora  o/pti
colorimetria/pr
coluna/pt
combativo/pdf
comensal/ip
competente/ps
composicional/pmd
comunal/ip
conclave/pt
conexo/fpd
conservante/tip
consubstancial/d
contente/pSs
contrabaixo/t
contrabando/ti
convencional/pti
convuls vel/d
corporativo/ftip
correcto/pfmIs
cosmobiologia/pr
cosmologia/pqrt
cosmopolita/ip
craniologia/qrt
criminal/ptdm
criptografia/pqr
cristalino/fpd
cristologia/prt
cronografia/prq
cronologia/pt
culto/pfi
curioso/pfmds
curto/pfmsh
czar/pti
dactilografia/pqr
decadente/tip
dedicado/fps
delicado/pfsm
demonologia/rt
denegridor/pdf
deontologia/qrt
dermatologia/qtr
despesa/pit
digno/pfmds
discurso/pt
discut vel/pi
dogmatologia/t
dramatologia/rt
dual/ptid
duelo/pt
ecometria/pr
editorial/ptp
egiptologia/rtq
elegante/pism
elevado/fps
embriologia/t
eminente/pms
emotivo/fpd
enorme/pmds
entomologia/prqt
epidemiologia/qtr
epimorfismo/pr
epistolografia/pqr
eremita/pi
escatologia/r
eslavo/pfti
espanhol/ip
espectrometria/pr
espiritual/pmtid
estado/pti
estenografia/pqr
estilo/pti
estrangeiro/pftiG
etiologia/pr
etnologia/qtr
excelente/psm
excepcional/pmd
existencial/pmti
extensivo/fmd
falange/pt
fatal/pmtid
febril/pd
fecundo/pfds
feliz/pmds
fenomenologia/pqr
feroz/pdsm
fidedigno/pdf
figura/pht
final/pmtids
fino/pfhms
fisiologia/qt
fisionomia/prt
fobia/pr
folclore/ti
fonometria/pr
formoso/fsp
forte/pmsp
fotologia/r
fragmento/pt
fraterno/fd
fresco/fps
fruticultura/prq
fundamental/pmti
futuro/pftidm
gastronomia/pr
general/pdsx
geografia/pr
germano/pti
gigante/pi
ginecocracia/pr
giro/fpsps
gnoseologia/r
gradual/mit
gramatologia/r
grandioso/pfdm
grato/fps
grave/pmds
habitual/pmi
halterofilia/pt
hidrografia/pqr
hierarquia/pr
higiene/t
historiografia/pqr
Hitler/i
homeopatia/pqr
homografia/qr
homomorfismo/pr
horizontal/pmd
icnografia/pqr
idiota/piG
ilustre/ps
imanente/pt
imaturo/pdf
imediato/pfmit
impenetr vel/d
imperial/pmtiA
implac vel/pmd
importante/ps
imprevis vel/pd
imunologia/r
inadmiss vel/pd
inato/fpi
incans vel/md
incompat vel/pd
incontest vel/pmd
indel vel/pd
indisput vel/d
individual/pmtid
industrial/pmtiEO
inexor vel/dm
infeliz/pmds
infla  o/Spti
insaci vel/pdm
insond vel/pd
integral/pmtidp
intelig vel/pmd
intenso/pfmds
interessante/pSs
internacional/pmtid
intoler vel/mdp
invi vel/pd
irreal/pdti
irrepreens vel/md
isometria/pr
isomorfismo/pr
janota/i
justo/pfmIs
laborioso/fpmd
largo/pfms
latim/i
leal/pimt
legal/pmtid
lento/fpms
letra/pth
leve/pmdsz
limitado/fps
lindo/pfms
literato/i
litografia/pqr
loiro/fps
longo/pfms
lusitano/fpidt
luxuoso/fpd
macho/pit
magnificente/ps
magro/fpsh
maior/pds
maneiro/ti
maratona/pt
marginal/ptimu
maternal/pmi
mecanografia/pqr
medalha/pt
memorial/td
mesmo/pfmds
meteoro/ip
metrologia/r
milenar/pt
misantropo/i
miser vel/pt
mitologia/pqr
moderno/pfmtidGEOs
morfina/i
motora/pt
mucoso/fdp
muito/sfp
museologia/qtr
mutual/tid
m vel/pdpd
narciso/ti
natural/pmtidsp
negativo/pfmtid
neologia/r
nervoso/pfmids
nevrologia/qr
nicotino/fi
normal/pmtds
nove/s
novo/pfmdsh
numeroso/pfds
obtuso/fpmd
ocidental/ptid
ocupado/fps
oleicultura/prq
oleoso/fpd
oral/pmd
ornamento/pt
ornitologia/qrt
palaciano/fpi
paleontologia/prqt
panorama/pt
parco/mspf
partido/pti
passional/pd
pastel/ptz
pateta/ipG
pequeno/pfs
percept vel/dIp
peregrino/pfmi
perplexo/pdf
pesado/fps
piada/thp
piano/thsp
pioneiro/fpi
piromania/pqr
polimorfia/pr
polimorfo/fi
pomposo/pdm
pontual/pmds
positivo/pfmtids
posterior/pmd
praxe/pti
presto/fs
primitivo/pfmid
produt vel/dp
projecto/pt
proven al/ip
proxeneta/i
psicopatia/pqr
puro/pfmtis
quanto/pfsfpfsfp
quedo/fti
quimera/tp
racional/pmtidI
raro/pfmds
rectangular/pd
reforma/pti
relaxe/ti
remiss vel/d
retalho/pt
reumatologia/qtr
reverendo/fps
rigoroso/pfmds
romance/pti
rural/ptid
sacerdotal/pi
santo/pfhds
seco/pfms
secreto/fpmis
segredo/pt
sentimental/ptidm
sereno/fdsmp
simbologia/r
simp tico/fpHs
sindical/pti
singular/pmdp
sociologia/qtirp
socorro/pi
subjectivo/pfmtid
sul/t
sumptuoso/fpdm
supremacia/ti
tanto/pfsfp
taxiologia/r
tecnofobia/pqr
teimoso/pmfs
telefone/pt
telemetria/pr
tendencioso/pd
terminologia/pr
toler vel/pi
topografia/pqr
total/pmtidp
trevo/s
triunfal/mit
trivial/pmd
ultraliberal/i
urbano/fptid
urgente/pms
urologia/rtq
valioso/pfms
vanguarda/pti
vasto/pfs
veloz/pds
verboso/dfp
violoncelo/tp
visual/pmd
vivaz/pds
volumetria/pr
vulgar/pmds
vulner vel/pd
Wagner/i
zoologia/qtrp
